New York, session 2025-2026, S3333.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The section heading and subdivision (b) of section 1144 of 2 the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 300 of the laws of 3 1960, are amended to read as follows: 4 Operation of vehicles on approach of authorized emergency vehicles or 5 vehicles displaying a green or blue light. 6 (b) This section shall not operate to relieve the driver of an author- 7 ized emergency vehicle or a vehicle authorized to display a green or 8 blue light from the duty to drive with reasonable care for all persons 9 using the highway. 10 § 2. Section 1144 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding 11 a new subdivision (a-1) to read as follows: 12 (a-1) Upon the immediate approach of a vehicle equipped with at least 13 one lighted lamp exhibiting a green or blue light, pursuant to subdivi- 14 sion forty-one of section three hundred seventy-five of this chapter, 15 which is visible under normal atmospheric conditions, the driver of 16 every other vehicle shall yield the right-of-way and shall immediately 17 drive to a position parallel to, and as close as possible to the right- 18 hand edge or curb of the roadway, or to either edge of a one-way roadway 19 three or more lanes in width, clear of any intersection, and shall stop 20 and remain in such position until the vehicle has passed. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06993-01-5